Tennessee, session 114, HB1826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-22-106(c)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting "One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)" and substituting "Two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-22-106(c)(2), is amended by
deleting "one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)" and substituting "two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1826
009846
- 1 -